Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Reading Assessment and Intervention

§ 21-3-401.
Reading assessment and intervention.

Each school district shall select and implement a reading assessment and intervention program that uses an instrument identified by the state superintendent under subsection (d) of this section that screens for signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies, not less than three (3) times per year in kindergarten through grade three (3) and that implements with fidelity an evidence based intervention program. The program shall include instruments identified by the state superintendent under subsection (d) of this section that monitor and measure reading progress and assess student reading skills and progress to provide data that informs any intervention. The assessment and intervention program shall be administered to all students in kindergarten through grade three (3). The program shall also include implementation of evidence based core curricula aligned to the uniform content and performance standards and evidenced based interventions to meet the needs of all students. The program shall be multi-tiered and shall include evidence based interventions to facilitate remediation of any reading difficulty as early as possible.

As soon as practicable after the assessment or screening is conducted under the program established in subsection (a) of this section, each school district shall provide a copy of the screening results, including an explanation of the screening results, to the parent, guardian or other person having control of a student showing signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies, or not showing appropriate reading competence under this section. Students not showing appropriate reading competence under this section shall be placed on an individualized reading plan to remedy the reading related difficulty utilizing an appropriate evidence based intervention program, which may include a group reading plan. The district shall provide a copy of a student’s individualized reading plan to the student’s parent, guardian or other person having control of the student. For students under an individualized education program (IEP) which addresses reading difficulties, the IEP shall be deemed sufficient to meet the requirements of this subsection and no additional plan shall be required.

Each district shall annually report to the department of education on the progress of each of its schools toward achieving the goal of eighty-five percent (85%) of all students reading at grade level upon completion of the third grade. This report shall include cohort analysis for kindergarten through grade three (3) for those students identified by the screening instruments as having signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies. The report shall include the percentage of students meeting or exceeding proficiency levels for the annual reporting period. The reporting shall also include the aggregate number of students identified by the screening instruments as having signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies, in addition to listing the evidence based interventions implemented in each district by grade. This report shall include kindergarten through grade three (3) progress toward achieving the goal of eighty-five percent (85%) proficiency in the specific skills known to be predictive of grade three (3) reading proficiency and that are listed in subsection (d) of this section. Grade three (3) reading proficiency shall be determined by the grade three (3) statewide assessment administered pursuant to W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v). Each school not meeting the eighty-five percent (85%) goal specified under this subsection shall submit an improvement plan to the school district, and the school district shall submit an overall improvement plan to the department. At a minimum, each school and district improvement plan shall outline its general strategy for increasing reading proficiency for the next school year and shall specifically address the evidence based program of instruction, assessment and intervention being implemented, the specific training in those programs that reading teachers have received, the student-teacher ratio, the use of certified tutors and the use of instructional facilitators and paraprofessionals in kindergarten through grade three (3) trained in the delivery of the evidence based instruction and intervention program selected by the district.

The state superintendent, in consultation with Wyoming school districts, professionals in the area of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies, and other appropriate stakeholders, shall promulgate rules as necessary to assist each school district to administer its reading assessment and intervention program pursuant to this section and to assess the skills in paragraphs (i) through (v) of this subsection using a curriculum-independent assessment. The rules shall contain criteria to identify instruments that screen for signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies, required under subsection (a) of this section. Based on the criteria incorporated by rule, the state superintendent shall identify instruments approved for use by school districts that monitor and measure reading progress and assess student reading skills and progress to provide data that informs any intervention required under subsection (a) of this section. The rules shall provide mechanisms for the state superintendent to directly support schools and school districts in meeting the goals of improvement plans developed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section including, but not limited to, professional development in evidence based literacy instruction and intervention and professional development in identifying the signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies. To accomplish the purposes of this subsection, the department of education shall collect kindergarten through grade three (3) statewide longitudinal data from assessments selected and performed by each school district, which measures the following specific skills that evidence based research has concluded are predictive of grade three (3) reading proficiency:

Phonological awareness;

Phonics;

Decoding words and nonwords;

Oral reading fluency; and

Reading comprehension.

Commencing with school year 2022-2023, each school district shall require each district employee providing instruction in grades kindergarten through three (3) within the district to have received or receive professional development in evidence based literacy instruction and intervention and in identifying the signs of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies, using suitable materials reviewed and required pursuant to rule by the state superintendent. The rules required under subsection (d) of this section shall establish minimum reading assessment and intervention professional development requirements to be completed not less than once every three (3) years as required under this subsection for district employees providing instruction in grades kindergarten through three (3). The rules shall contain criteria to identify appropriate and suitable professional development materials for district employees in evidence based literacy instruction and intervention and in detection of reading difficulties, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 189, § 1; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2012, ch. 66, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2019 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the section modifying the early reading program.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), inserted “and includes prescreening for dyslexia and other reading difficulties as early as possible” in the first sentence, and added the present third and last sentences; in (c), added the third sentence; and added (d).

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (d).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (d), substituted “state superintendent” for “director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted "select" for "design," and "reading assessment and intervention program that uses an instrument that screens for signs of dyslexia" for "reading screening program that measures student reading progress and includes prescreening for dyslexia," added "and that implements with fidelity an evidence based intervention program" following "grade three (3)" at the end of the first sentence, substituted "program shall include instruments that monitor and measure reading progress and assess student reading skills and progress to provide data that informs any intervention. The assessment and intervention program shall be administered to all students in kindergarten through grade three (3)" for "screening program shall include a reading assessment plan using screening instruments approved by the department of education, which is administered to all students in kindergarten through grade three (3), with standardized measures providing statewide longitudinal data and providing the capability for monitoring and measuring reading progress. In addition to a universal screening instrument, the department of education shall identify assessment instruments utilized to identify dyslexia and other reading difficulties," "implementation of evidence based" for "a plan for implementation of research based," "uniform content and performance standards" for "statewide educational program standards," and "evidence based interventions" for "various interventions"; in (c), substituted "achieving" for "reaching," "report shall" for "report shall include longitudinal data on all students in kindergarten through grade three (3), and shall," "annual reporting period" for "reporting period," added "as having signs of dyslexia or other reading difficulties in addition to listing the evidence based interventions implemented" following "screening instruments," added the third and fourth sentences, added "school district, and the school district shall submit an overall improvement plan to the" preceding "department," substituted "each school and district improvement plan shall outline its general strategy" for "the improvement plan shall outline the district's general strategy," added "evidence based program of instruction, assessment and intervention being implemented, the specific training in those programs that reading teachers have received, the" preceding "student-teacher," "and paraprofessionals" following "instructional facilitators," and substituted "grade three (3) trained in the delivery of the evidence based instruction and intervention program selected by the district" for "grade three (3) in all schools within the district "; in the introductory language in (d), substituted "to assist each school district to administer its reading assessment" for "to administer the reading assessment," "section and to assess the skills in paragraphs (i) through (v) of this subsection using a curriculum-independent assessment" for "statute," and added the second and third sentences and (d)(i) through (d)(v).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a), in the first sentence, added “identified by the state superintendent under subsection (d) of this section,” deleted “dyslexia and other” following “signs of,” substituted “including but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies, not less than three (3) times per year” for “as early as possible,” added “identified by the state superintendent under subsection (d) of this section” in the second sentence; added the first and third sentences in (b); in (c), added the second sentence, in the present fourth sentence, deleted “dyslexia or other” following “signs of,” added “, including but not limited to dyslexia or other reading deficiencies,”; in the introductory language of (d), in the first sentence, “dyslexia and other” following “area of,” added “, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies,” deleted “and regulations” following “promulgate rules,” added the second and third sentences, in the fourth sentence, deleted “dyslexia and other” following “signs of,” added “, including but not limited to dyslexia and other reading deficiencies,” substituted “three (3)” for “two (2)” in the last sentence; added (e); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 189, § 1, and Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1, both enacted an article 3 in chapter 3 in this title. The provisions enacted by Laws 2001, ch. 189, § 1, were redesignated as article 4 (§

21-3-401

) by the legislative service office.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).